bagval_numbers.lexd
PATTERN decimal
rootDec dec

PATTERN centi
rootCent cent

PATTERN milli
rootCent mil

PATTERN singles
rootInit[DaNumber] end[DaNumber]
rootInit[RaNumber] end[RaNumber] # ра, Кибрик et al. С. 155

PATTERN DaSuffixedNums
decimal end[DaNumber]
milli end[DaNumber]
centi end[DaNumber]

PATTERN NomNumbersAgr
singles ( OblAdjSingular[OblSu] | OblAdjPlural[OblPlLu] )
DaSuffixedNums ( OblAdjSingular[OblSu] | OblAdjPlural[OblPlLu] )

PATTERN NomNumbersNonAgr
singles OblAdjSingular[OblFLi]
singles OblAdjSingular[OblNLi]
singles OblAdjPlural[OblPlLi]
DaSuffixedNums OblAdjSingular[OblLi]
DaSuffixedNums OblAdjSingular[OblNLi]
DaSuffixedNums OblAdjPlural[OblPlLi]

PATTERN OrdNumbersSer1
singles ordinalOpt? ordinal[ser1] 
DaSuffixedNums ordinalOpt? ordinal[ser1]

PATTERN OrdNumbersSer2
singles ordinalOpt ordinal[ser2] 
DaSuffixedNums ordinalOpt ordinal[ser2]

PATTERN OblAdjAgr
agrFinal[Msg] OblSingular[OblSu]
agrFinal[Hpl] OblPlural[OblPlLu]

PATTERN OblAdjNonAgr
agrFinal[Fsg] OblSingular[OblLi]
agrFinal[Nsg] OblSingular[OblLi]
agrFinal[Npl] OblPlural[OblPlLi]

PATTERN OblAdjDative
agrFinal[Msg] DatExcMin[OblSu]
agrFinal[Fsg] DatExcMin[OblLi]
agrFinal[Nsg] DatExcMin[OblLi]
agrFinal[Hpl] DatExcMin[OblPlLu]
agrFinal[Npl] DatExcMin[OblLi]

PATTERN OblAdjSup
agrFinal[Msg] SupExcMin[OblSu] directCase
agrFinal[Fsg] SupExcMin[OblLi] directCase
agrFinal[Nsg] SupExcMin[OblLi] directCase
agrFinal[Hpl] SupExcMin[OblPlLu] directCase
agrFinal[Npl] SupExcMin[OblLi] directCase

PATTERN LiFusion
SupExceptions[OblFLi]
SupExceptions[OblNLi]
DatExceptions[OblFLi]
DatExceptions[OblNLi]

PATTERN PronModifiers
NegPronounSuffix
IndefPronounSuffix

PATTERN CasesGenAgr
CaseMain[ErgR,-nullNom]
genitiveCase[GenAgr]
locMain directCase

PATTERN CasesGenNonAgr
CaseMain[ErgR,-nullNom]
genitiveCase[-GenAgr]
locMain directCase

PATTERN AddCasesMsg
CaseMain[nullNom]
DatExcMin[OblSu]
SupExcMin[OblSu] directCase

PATTERN AddCasesFNsg
CaseMain[nullNom]
DatExcMin[OblLi]
SupExcMin[OblLi] directCase

PATTERN AddCasesHpl
CaseMain[nullNom]
DatExcMin[OblPlLu]
SupExcMin[OblPlLu] directCase

PATTERN AddCasesNpl
CaseMain[nullNom]
DatExcMin[OblLi]
SupExcMin[OblLi] directCase
